dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX DX Y 68
SFX DX ти л .
SFX DX ти ла .
SFX DX ти ло .
SFX DX ти ли .
SFX DX ати ју .
SFX DX ати им .
SFX DX ати иш .
SFX DX ати и .
SFX DX ати имо .
SFX DX ати ите .
SFX DX ати ет .
SFX DX ти х .
SFX DX ти ше .
SFX DX ти хмо .
SFX DX ти сте .
SFX DX ти ху .
SFX DX ати ечи .
SFX DX ати еча .
SFX DX ати ече .
SFX DX ати имы .
SFX DX ати имого .
SFX DX ати имому .
SFX DX ати имым .
SFX DX ати имом .
SFX DX ати имо .
SFX DX ати има .
SFX DX ати иму .
SFX DX ати имој .
SFX DX ати имоју .
SFX DX ати ими .
SFX DX ати име .
SFX DX ати имых .
SFX DX ати имым .
SFX DX ати имыми .
SFX DX ти вши .
SFX DX ти вшего .
SFX DX ти вшему .
SFX DX ти вшим .
SFX DX ти вшем .
SFX DX ти вших .
SFX DX ти вшими .
SFX DX ти вша .
SFX DX ти вшу .
SFX DX ти вшеј .
SFX DX ти вшеју .
SFX DX ти вше .
SFX DX ти ны .
SFX DX ти ного .
SFX DX ти ному .
SFX DX ти ным .
SFX DX ти ном .
SFX DX ти ни .
SFX DX ти не .
SFX DX ти ных .
SFX DX ти ными .
SFX DX ти на .
SFX DX ти ну .
SFX DX ти ној .
SFX DX ти ноју .
SFX DX ти но .
SFX DX ти нје/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нја/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нју/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX DX ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX DX ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX DY Y 12
SFX DY 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DY е о/xPxBxO .
SFX DY 0 на/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 не/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 н/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 ни/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 ну/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 нах/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 нам/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 нем/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 ном/xPxE .
SFX DY 0 нами/xPxE .

SFX DZ Y 4
SFX DZ сот исот .
SFX DZ сот истах .
SFX DZ сот истам .
SFX DZ сот јустами .

SFX Da Y 11
SFX Da 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Da 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Da ес си/xPxE .
SFX Da ес са/xPxE .
SFX Da ес сов/xPxE .
SFX Da ес су/xPxE .
SFX Da ес сах/xPxE .
SFX Da ес сам/xPxE .
SFX Da ес сом/xPxE .
SFX Da ес сами/xPxE .
SFX Da ес се/xPxE .

SFX Db Y 11
SFX Db 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Db и о/xPxBxO .
SFX Db и је/xPxE .
SFX Db и ју/xPxE .
SFX Db и еј/xPxE .
SFX Db и ји/xPxE .
SFX Db и јах/xPxE .
SFX Db и јам/xPxE .
SFX Db и јеју/xPxE .
SFX Db и јами/xPxE .
SFX Db и јо/xPxE .

SFX Dc Y 68
SFX Dc ти л .
SFX Dc ти ла .
SFX Dc ти ло .
SFX Dc ти ли .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипју .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипим .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипиш .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипи .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимо .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипите .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипет .
SFX Dc ти х .
SFX Dc ти ше .
SFX Dc ти хмо .
SFX Dc ти сте .
SFX Dc ти ху .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипечи .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипеча .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипече .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимы .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимого .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимому .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимым .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимом .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимо .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипима .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипиму .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимој .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимоју .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипими .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипиме .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимых .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимым .
SFX Dc ыпєти ипимыми .
SFX Dc ти вши .
SFX Dc ти вшего .
SFX Dc ти вшему .
SFX Dc ти вшим .
SFX Dc ти вшем .
SFX Dc ти вших .
SFX Dc ти вшими .
SFX Dc ти вша .
SFX Dc ти вшу .
SFX Dc ти вшеј .
SFX Dc ти вшеју .
SFX Dc ти вше .
SFX Dc ти ны .
SFX Dc ти ного .
SFX Dc ти ному .
SFX Dc ти ным .
SFX Dc ти ном .
SFX Dc ти ни .
SFX Dc ти не .
SFX Dc ти ных .
SFX Dc ти ными .
SFX Dc ти на .
SFX Dc ти ну .
SFX Dc ти ној .
SFX Dc ти ноју .
SFX Dc ти но .
SFX Dc ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Dc ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Dd Y 11
SFX Dd 0 е .
SFX Dd 0 и .
SFX Dd 0 а .
SFX Dd 0 ев .
SFX Dd 0 иј .
SFX Dd 0 у .
SFX Dd 0 ах .
SFX Dd 0 ам .
SFX Dd 0 ем .
SFX Dd 0 ју .
SFX Dd 0 ами .

SFX De Y 11
SFX De 0 0/xPxE .
SFX De а о/xPxBxO .
SFX De оха хы/xPxE .
SFX De оха ху/xPxE .
SFX De оха х/xPxE .
SFX De оха хє/xPxE .
SFX De оха хах/xPxE .
SFX De оха хам/xPxE .
SFX De оха хоју/xPxE .
SFX De оха хами/xPxE .
SFX De оха хо/xPxE .

SFX Df Y 11
SFX Df 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Df о о/xPxBxO .
SFX Df о а/xPxE .
SFX Df но он/xPxE .
SFX Df о у/xPxE .
SFX Df о ах/xPxE .
SFX Df о ам/xPxE .
SFX Df 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Df о ами/xPxE .
SFX Df но ен/xPxE .
SFX Df о ју/xPxE .

SFX Dg Y 21
SFX Dg 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Dg об б/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бы/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX Dg об ба/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бов/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бу/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бах/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бам/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бом/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бами/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Dg об бе/xPxE .
SFX Dg 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Dh Y 11
SFX Dh 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Dh 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Dh 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Di Y 6
SFX Di 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Di и е/xPxBxO .
SFX Di и ов/xPxE .
SFX Di и ах/xPxE .
SFX Di и ам/xPxE .
SFX Di и ами/xPxE .

SFX Dj Y 80
SFX Dj ти л .
SFX Dj ти ла .
SFX Dj ти ло .
SFX Dj ти ли .
SFX Dj вати ју .
SFX Dj вати јем .
SFX Dj вати јеш .
SFX Dj вати је .
SFX Dj вати јемо .
SFX Dj вати јете .
SFX Dj вати јут .
SFX Dj ти х .
SFX Dj ти ше .
SFX Dj ти хмо .
SFX Dj ти сте .
SFX Dj ти ху .
SFX Dj вати ј .
SFX Dj вати јмо .
SFX Dj вати јте .
SFX Dj вати јучи .
SFX Dj вати јучего .
SFX Dj вати јучему .
SFX Dj вати јучим .
SFX Dj вати јучем .
SFX Dj вати јучих .
SFX Dj вати јучими .
SFX Dj вати јуча .
SFX Dj вати јучу .
SFX Dj вати јучеј .
SFX Dj вати јучеју .
SFX Dj вати јуче .
SFX Dj вати јемы .
SFX Dj вати јемого .
SFX Dj вати јемому .
SFX Dj вати јемым .
SFX Dj вати јемом .
SFX Dj вати јемо .
SFX Dj вати јема .
SFX Dj вати јему .
SFX Dj вати јемој .
SFX Dj вати јемоју .
SFX Dj вати јеми .
SFX Dj вати јеме .
SFX Dj вати јемых .
SFX Dj вати јемым .
SFX Dj вати јемыми .
SFX Dj ти вши .
SFX Dj ти вшего .
SFX Dj ти вшему .
SFX Dj ти вшим .
SFX Dj ти вшем .
SFX Dj ти вших .
SFX Dj ти вшими .
SFX Dj ти вша .
SFX Dj ти вшу .
SFX Dj ти вшеј .
SFX Dj ти вшеју .
SFX Dj ти вше .
SFX Dj ти ны .
SFX Dj ти ного .
SFX Dj ти ному .
SFX Dj ти ным .
SFX Dj ти ном .
SFX Dj ти ни .
SFX Dj ти не .
SFX Dj ти ных .
SFX Dj ти ными .
SFX Dj ти на .
SFX Dj ти ну .
SFX Dj ти ној .
SFX Dj ти ноју .
SFX Dj ти но .
SFX Dj ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Dj ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Dk Y 28
SFX Dk 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX Dk ы а/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы ого/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы у/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы ој/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы ом/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы ому/xPxE .
SFX Dk 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы оју/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы и/xPxE .
SFX Dk ы е/xPxE .
SFX Dk 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Dk 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX Dk кы ши/zz .
SFX Dk кы шего/zz .
SFX Dk кы шему/zz .
SFX Dk кы шим/zz .
SFX Dk кы шем/zz .
SFX Dk кы ше/zz .
SFX Dk кы ша/zz .
SFX Dk кы шу/zz .
SFX Dk кы шеј/zz .
SFX Dk кы шеју/zz .
SFX Dk кы ших/zz .
SFX Dk кы шим/zz .
SFX Dk кы шими/zz .
SFX Dk ткы че/xPxE .

SFX Dl Y 11
SFX Dl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dl 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Dl ев јви/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јва/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јвов/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јву/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јвах/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јвам/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јвом/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јвами/xPxE .
SFX Dl ев јве/xPxE .
