dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
спати/DX
заиме/DY
петсот/DZ
врєме/DY
пес/Da
пани/Db
кыпєти/Dc
тысеч/Dd
блоха/De
дно/Df
лоб/Dg
водж/Dh
гроши/Di
жувати/Dj
краткы/Dk
лев/Dl
проспати/DX
близнеци/Di
мєстоиме/DY
прєспати/DX
прєзиме/DY
сєме/DY
старци/Di
знаме/DY
брєме/DY
име/DY
раме/DY
племе/DY
богыни/Db
выме/DY
заспати/DX
писме/DY
меджуврєме/DY
близнеци/Di
кроха/De
кроткы/Dk
лев/Dl
наспати/DX
выспати/DX
заспати/DX
проспати/DX
поспати/DX
прєжувати/Dj
стреме/DY
изливати/Dj
